Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Article 1. Alaska Disaster Act.
Sec. 26.23.075.
Emergency plans.

An emergency plan prepared under AS

26.23.073

must include

identification of facilities subject to the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 11001 — 11005 that are within the emergency planning district, identification of routes likely to be used for the transportation of substances on the list of extremely hazardous substances referred to in 42 U.S.C. 11002(a), and identification of additional facilities contributing or subjected to additional risk due to their proximity to facilities subject to the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 11001 — 11005 such as hospitals or natural gas facilities;

methods and procedures to be followed by facility owners and operators and local emergency and medical personnel to respond to a release of hazardous substances or a release of substances on the list of extremely hazardous substances referred to in 42 U.S.C. 11002(a);

designation of an emergency coordinator, as required under AS

26.23.060(d)

, and facility emergency coordinators, who shall make determinations necessary to implement the emergency plan;

procedures providing reliable, effective, and timely notification by the facility emergency coordinators to persons designated in the emergency plan, and to the public, that a release has occurred, consistent with the emergency notification requirements of 42 U.S.C. 11004;

methods for determining the occurrence of a release and the area or population likely to be affected by that release;

a description of emergency equipment and facilities in the community and at each facility in the community subject to the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 11001 — 11005, and an identification of the persons responsible for the equipment and facilities;

evacuation plans, including provisions for a precautionary evacuation and alternative traffic routes;

training programs, including schedules for training of local emergency response and medical personnel; and

methods and schedules for exercising the emergency plan.

An emergency plan prepared under AS

26.23.073

may include descriptions, procedures, and programs related to disasters other than those caused by releases of hazardous substances.

Each emergency plan prepared under AS

26.23.073

must incorporate within it an incident command system. The incident command system must be substantially equivalent in relevant respects to the incident command systems established under AS

46.04.200

—

46.04.210

and meet the requirements of AS

26.23.077

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 32 SLA 1994)

Sec. 26.23.077.
Plan review; incident command systems.

The commission shall review and make recommendations about local, interjurisdictional, regional, and state emergency plans, including the Alaska intrastate mutual aid system established in AS

26.23.500

, other plans prepared under this chapter and AS

46.04.200

—

46.04.210

, and all emergency plans prepared by state agencies under other authorities.

When making recommendations about a plan, the commission shall suggest changes that ensure that the plan includes an incident command system that describes the respective roles of affected persons and agencies in a clear and specific manner and that the respective roles of state agencies are consistent with their statutory duties. The commission shall also suggest changes that ensure that the plans are well-integrated with related plans.

To the extent consistent with other law, an incident command system recommended under this section or included in a plan reviewed under this section must provide that the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs has a major role in mobilization of personnel and resources, communications, transportation planning, and other logistics involved in a state response to a disaster or other emergency.

History.

(§ 12 ch 32 SLA 1994; am § 4 ch 67 SLA 2012)

Sec. 26.23.080.
Federal disaster loans to political subdivisions.

Whenever, at the request of the governor, the President has declared a major disaster to exist in this state, the governor may

upon the governor’s determination that a political subdivision of the state will suffer a substantial loss of tax and other revenue from the disaster and has demonstrated a need for financial assistance to perform its governmental functions, apply to the federal government, on behalf of the political subdivision, for a loan; the governor may receive and disburse the proceeds of any approved loan to any applicant political subdivision;

determine the amount needed by any applicant political subdivision to restore or resume its governmental functions, and to certify the amount to the federal government;

recommend to the federal government, based upon review by the governor, the cancellation of all or any part of repayment when, for the first three full fiscal years following the major disaster, the revenue of the political subdivision is insufficient to meet its operating expenses, including additional disaster-related expenses of a municipal operation character.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977; am § 8 ch 178 SLA 1990)

Sec. 26.23.090.
Grants to disaster victims.

Whenever the President, at the request of the governor, has declared a major disaster to exist in this state, the governor may

upon the governor’s determination that financial assistance is essential to meet disaster-related necessary expenses or serious needs of individuals or families adversely affected by a major disaster that cannot be otherwise adequately met from other means of assistance, accept a grant by the federal government to fund that financial assistance, subject to the terms and conditions that may be imposed upon the grant;

enter into an agreement with the federal government, or any officer or agency of it, pledging the state to participate in the funding of the financial assistance authorized in (1) of this subsection, in an amount not to exceed 25 percent of the assistance and, if state funds are not otherwise available to the governor, to accept an advance of the state’s share from the federal government to be repaid when the state is able to do so.

The governor is authorized to make financial grants to an individual or family to meet disaster-related necessary expenses or serious needs of individuals or families adversely affected by the disaster that cannot otherwise adequately be met from other means of assistance. The governor may make a grant to an individual and family under this subsection as follows:

when the President declares a major disaster, the governor may make a grant of an amount whose total of federal and state shares does not exceed the maximum amount authorized by 42 U.S.C. 5174(h) for grants payable to individuals and families;

when the President does not declare a major disaster but the governor declares a disaster emergency, the governor may make a grant of an amount not to exceed one-half of the maximum grant amount established under (1) of this subsection.

[Repealed, § 18 ch 178 SLA 1990.]

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977; am §§ 9, 18 ch 178 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For individual and family disaster grants, see 6 AAC 94, art. 2.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 39, SLA 2010 (HB 292), amending (b) of this section to increase the limits on state grants payable to disaster victims, see 2009 House Journal 1288 — 1289.

Sec. 26.23.100.
Temporary housing.

Whenever the governor has proclaimed a disaster emergency, or the President, at the request of the governor, has declared an emergency or a major disaster to exist in this state, the governor may

purchase, lease, or make other arrangements with any agency of the United States or state for temporary housing units to be occupied by disaster victims and to make those units available to any political subdivision of the state;

assist any political subdivision of this state that is the location of temporary housing for disaster victims to acquire sites necessary for the temporary housing and do all things necessary to prepare the site to receive and use temporary housing units by

advancing or lending funds available to the governor from an appropriation made by the legislature or from any other source;

passing through funds made available by any agency, public or private; or

becoming a copartner with a political subdivision for the execution and performance of any temporary housing for disaster-victim projects and, for those purposes, pledging the credit of the state on terms considered appropriate, having due regard for current debt transactions of the state;

under whatever relevant regulations the governor may adopt, temporarily suspend or modify, for not more than 60 days, any public health, safety, zoning, transportation, or other requirement of law or regulation of the state, when by proclamation, the governor declares a suspension or modification essential to provide temporary housing for disaster victims.

A political subdivision of this state may acquire, temporarily or permanently, by purchase, lease, or otherwise, sites required for installation of temporary housing units for disaster victims, and to enter into whatever arrangements, including purchase of temporary housing units and payment of transportation charges, that are necessary to prepare or equip those sites to receive and use the housing units.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977)

Administrative Code. —

For temporary housing assistance, see 6 AAC 94, art. 3.

Sec. 26.23.110.
Debris and wreckage removal in disaster emergency or major disaster.

When the governor has declared a disaster emergency, or the President, at the request of the governor, has declared a major disaster or emergency to exist in this state, the governor may

through the use of state agencies, clear from publicly or privately owned land or water, debris and wreckage that may threaten public health, safety, or property;

apply for and accept funds from the federal government and use those funds to make grants to a political subdivision for the purpose of removing debris or wreckage from publicly or privately owned land or water.

Authority under (a)(1) of this section may not be exercised unless the affected political subdivision, corporation, organization, or individual unconditionally authorizes the removal of the debris or wreckage from public and private property and, in the case of removal of debris or wreckage from private property, first agrees to indemnify the state government against claims arising from the removal.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977; am §§ 10, 11 ch 178 SLA 1990)

Secs. 26.23.120 — 26.23.130.
Interstate Civil Defense and Disaster Compact entered into; compact terms. [Repealed, § 5 ch 55 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 26.23.135.
Emergency Management Assistance Compact enacted and entered into.

The Emergency Management Assistance Compact is hereby enacted into law and entered into with all jurisdictions legally joining in it in a form substantially as contained in AS

26.23.136

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 55 SLA 2002)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 55, SLA 2002 (CSSB 235(STA)), see 2002 Senate Journal 1952 — 1954.

Sec. 26.23.136.
Compact terms.

The terms and provisions of the compact referred to in AS

26.23.135

are as follows:

History.

(§ 3 ch 55 SLA 2002)

EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT ASSISTANCE COMPACT

ARTICLE I PURPOSES; DEFINITIONS

This compact is made and entered into by and between the participating member states that enact this compact, which are called party states. For the purposes of this agreement, “states” means the several states, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia, and all United States territorial possessions.

The purpose of this compact is to provide for mutual assistance between the states entering into this compact in managing any emergency or disaster that is declared by the governor of the affected state or states, whether arising from natural disaster, technological hazard, man-made disaster, civil emergency aspects of resources shortages, community disorders, insurgency, or enemy attack.

This compact shall also provide for mutual cooperation in emergency-related exercises, testing, or other training activities using equipment and personnel simulating performance of any aspect of the giving and receiving of aid by party states or subdivisions of party states during emergencies, such actions occurring outside actual declared emergency periods. Mutual assistance in this compact may include the use of the states’ National Guard forces, either in accordance with the National Guard Mutual Assistance Compact or by mutual agreement between states.

ARTICLE II GENERAL IMPLEMENTATION

Each party state entering into this compact recognizes many emergencies transcend political jurisdiction boundaries and that intergovernmental coordination is essential in managing these and other emergencies under this compact. Each state further recognizes that there will be emergencies that require immediate access and present procedures to apply outside resources to make a prompt and effective response to such an emergency. This is because few, if any, individual states have all the resources that they may need in all types of emergencies or the capability of delivering resources to areas where emergencies exist.

The prompt, full, and effective utilization of resources of the participating states, including any resources on hand or available from the federal government or any other source, that are essential to the safety, care, and welfare of the people in the event of any emergency or disaster declared by a party state is the underlying principle on which all articles of this compact are understood.

On behalf of the governor of each state participating in the compact, the legally designated state official who is assigned responsibility for emergency management is responsible for formulation of the appropriate interstate mutual aid plans and procedures necessary to implement this compact.

ARTICLE III PARTY STATE RESPONSIBILITIES

It is the responsibility of each party state to formulate procedural plans and programs for interstate cooperation in the performance of the responsibilities listed in this article. In formulating such plans, and in carrying them out, the party states, insofar as practical, shall

review individual state hazards analyses and, to the extent reasonably possible, determine all those potential emergencies the party states might jointly suffer, whether due to natural disaster, technological hazard, man-made disaster, emergency aspects of resource shortages, civil disorders, insurgency, or enemy attack;

review party states’ individual emergency plans and develop a plan that will determine the mechanism for the interstate management and provision of assistance concerning any potential emergency;

develop interstate procedures to fill any identified gaps and to resolve any identified inconsistencies or overlaps in existing or developed plans;

assist in warning communities adjacent to or crossing the state boundaries;

protect and assure uninterrupted delivery of services, medicines, water, food, energy and fuel, search and rescue, and critical lifeline equipment, services, and resources, both human and material;

inventory and set procedures for the interstate loan and delivery of human and material resources, together with procedures for reimbursement or forgiveness; and

provide, to the extent authorized by law, for temporary suspension of any statutes or ordinances that restrict the implementation of the responsibilities listed in (1) — (6) of this subsection.

The authorized representative of a party state may request assistance of another party state by contacting the authorized representative of that state. The provisions of this agreement only apply to requests for assistance made by and to authorized representatives. Requests may be verbal or in writing. If verbal, the request shall be confirmed in writing within 30 days of the verbal request. Requests shall provide the following information:

a description of the emergency service function for which assistance is needed, such as, but not limited to, fire services, law enforcement, emergency medical, transportation, communications, public works and engineering, building inspection, planning and information assistance, mass care, resource support, health and medical services, and search and rescue;

the amount and type of personnel, equipment, materials and supplies needed, and a reasonable estimate of the length of time they will be needed; and

the specific place and time for staging of the assisting party’s response and a point of contact at that location.

There shall be frequent consultation between state officials who have assigned emergency management responsibilities and other appropriate representatives of the party states with affected jurisdictions and the United States government, with free exchange of information, plans, and resource records relating to emergency capabilities.

ARTICLE IV LIMITATIONS

Any party state requested to render mutual aid or conduct exercises and training for mutual aid shall take such action as is necessary to provide and make available the resources covered by this compact in accordance with the terms of the compact; however, it is understood that the state rendering aid may withhold resources to the extent necessary to provide reasonable protection for such state. Each party state shall afford to the emergency forces of any party state, while operating within its state limits under the terms and conditions of this compact, the same powers, except that of arrest unless specifically authorized by the receiving state; duties; rights; and privileges as are afforded forces of the state in which they are performing emergency services. Emergency forces will continue under the command and control of their regular leaders, but the organizational units will come under the operational control of the emergency services authorities of the state receiving assistance. These conditions may be activated, as needed, only subsequent to a declaration of a state of emergency or disaster by the governor of the party state that is to receive assistance or commencement of exercises or training for mutual aid and shall continue so long as the exercises or training for mutual aid are in progress, the state of emergency or disaster remains in effect, or loaned resources remain in the receiving state or states, whichever is longest.

ARTICLE V LICENSES AND PERMITS

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, whenever any person holds a license, certificate, or other permit issued by any state party to the compact evidencing the meeting of qualifications for professional, mechanical, or other skills, and when such assistance is requested by the receiving party state, the person is deemed licensed, certified, or permitted by the state requesting assistance to render aid involving such a skill to meet a declared emergency or disaster, subject to the limitations and conditions as the governor of the requesting state may prescribe by proclamation or otherwise.

ARTICLE VI LIABILITY

Officers or employees of a party state rendering aid in another state under this compact are considered agents of the requesting state for tort liability and immunity purposes; and a party state or its officers or employees rendering aid in another state in accordance with this compact is not liable on account of any act or omission in good faith on the part of such forces while so engaged or on account of the maintenance or use of any equipment or supplies in connection with the rendering of that aid. Good faith in this article does not include wilful misconduct, gross negligence, or recklessness.

ARTICLE VII SUPPLEMENTARY AGREEMENTS

Inasmuch as it is probable that the pattern and detail of the machinery for mutual aid among two or more states may differ from that among the states that are party to the compact, this instrument contains elements of a broad base common to all states, and nothing contained in the compact precludes any state from entering into supplementary agreements with another state or affects any other agreements already in force between states. Supplementary agreements may comprehend, but are not limited to, provisions for evacuation and reception of injured and other persons and the exchange of medical, fire, police, public utility, reconnaissance, welfare, transportation and communications personnel, and equipment and supplies.

ARTICLE VIII COMPENSATION

Each party state shall provide for the payment of compensation and death benefits to injured members of the emergency forces of that state and representatives of deceased members of such forces in case those members sustain injuries or are killed while rendering aid under this compact, in the same manner and on the same terms as if the injury or death were sustained within their own state.

ARTICLE IX REIMBURSEMENT

Any party state rendering aid in another state under this compact shall be reimbursed by the party state receiving the aid for any loss or damage to or expense incurred in the operation of any equipment and the provision of any service in answering a request for aid and for the costs incurred in connection with such a request; however, any aiding party state may assume in whole or in part the loss, damage, expense, or other cost, or may loan equipment or donate services to the receiving party state without charge or cost and, further, any two or more party states may enter into supplementary agreements establishing a different allocation of costs among those states. Article VIII expenses are not reimbursable under this provision.

ARTICLE X EVACUATION

Plans for the orderly evacuation and interstate reception of portions of the civilian population as the result of any emergency or disaster of sufficient proportions to so warrant, shall be worked out and maintained between the party states and the emergency management or services directors of the various jurisdictions where any type of incident requiring evacuations might occur. The plans shall be put into effect by request of the state from which evacuees come and shall include the manner of transporting the evacuees, the number of evacuees to be received in different areas, the manner in which food, clothing, housing, and medical care will be provided, the registration of the evacuees, the providing of facilities for the notification of relatives or friends, and the forwarding of the evacuees to other areas or the bringing in of additional materials, supplies, and all other relevant factors. The plans shall provide that the party state receiving evacuees and the party state from which the evacuees come shall mutually agree as to reimbursement of out-of-pocket expenses incurred in receiving and caring for the evacuees, for expenditures for transportation, food, clothing, medicines and medical care, and like items. Such expenditures shall be reimbursed as agreed by the party state from which the evacuees come. After the termination of the emergency or disaster, the party state from which the evacuees come shall assume the responsibility for the ultimate support of repatriation of the evacuees.

ARTICLE XI IMPLEMENTATION

This compact becomes operative immediately upon its enactment into law by any two states; after that, this compact becomes effective as to any other state upon its enactment by that state.

Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the compact, but the withdrawal does not take effect until 30 days after the governor of the withdrawing state has given notice in writing of the withdrawal to the governors of all other party states. The action does not relieve the withdrawing state from obligations assumed under the compact before the effective date of withdrawal.

Duly authenticated copies of this compact and of any supplementary agreements as may be entered into shall, at the time of their approval, be deposited with each of the party states and with the Federal Emergency Management Agency and other appropriate agencies of the United States government.

ARTICLE XII VALIDITY

This Act shall be construed to effectuate the purposes stated in Article I of this compact. If any provision of this compact is declared unconstitutional, or the applicability of the compact to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of this compact and the applicability of the compact to other persons and circumstances are not affected by the invalidity of any provision of the compact.

ARTICLE XIII ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS

Nothing in this compact authorizes or permits the use of military force by the National Guard of a state at any place outside that state in any emergency for which the President is authorized by law to call into federal service the militia, or for any purpose for which the use of the Army or the Air Force would in the absence of express statutory authorization be prohibited under 18 U.S.C. 1385.

Sec. 26.23.140.
Local disaster emergencies.

A local disaster emergency may be declared only by the principal executive officer of a political subdivision. It may not be continued or renewed for a period in excess of seven days, except by or with the consent of the governing board of the political subdivision. An order or proclamation declaring, continuing, or terminating a local disaster emergency shall be given prompt and general publicity, and shall be filed promptly with the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management and the appropriate municipal clerk.

The effect of a declaration of a local disaster emergency is to activate the response and recovery aspects of any and all applicable local or interjurisdictional disaster emergency plans, and to authorize the furnishing of aid and assistance under those plans.

A representative of an interjurisdictional disaster planning and service area may not declare a local disaster emergency unless expressly authorized by the principal executive officer of each political subdivision in the emergency area.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977; am § 13 ch 32 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (a) of this section, “division of emergency services” was changed to “division of homeland security and emergency management” in accordance with § 26(b), ch. 179, SLA 2004.

Sec. 26.23.150.
Disaster prevention.

In addition to disaster prevention measures as included in the state, local, and interjurisdictional disaster plans, the governor shall consider, on a continuing basis, steps that could be taken to prevent or reduce the harmful consequences of disasters. At the governor’s direction, and under any other authority and competence they have, state agencies, including but not limited to those charged with responsibilities in connection with flood plain management, stream encroachment and flow regulation, weather modification, fire prevention and control, environmental quality, public works, land use and land use planning, and construction standards, shall make studies of disaster-prevention-related matters. The governor, from time to time, shall make recommendations to the legislature, local governments, and other appropriate public and private entities as may facilitate measures for the prevention or reduction of the harmful consequences of disasters.

Appropriate departments, in conjunction with the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management, shall keep land uses and location of structures and other facilities under continuing study, and identify areas that are particularly susceptible to severe land shifting, subsidence, flood, or other catastrophic occurrence. The studies under this subsection shall concentrate on means of reducing or avoiding the dangers caused by this occurrence or the consequences of it.

If the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management believes, on the basis of the studies or other competent evidence and after consultation with the appropriate local planning agencies, that an area is susceptible to a disaster of catastrophic proportions without adequate warning, that existing building standards and land use controls in that area are inadequate and could add substantially to the magnitude of the disaster, and that changes in zoning regulations, other land use regulations, or building requirements are essential in order to further the purposes of this section, it shall specify the essential changes to the governor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977; am § 14 ch 32 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (b) and (c) of this section, “division of emergency services” was changed to “division of homeland security and emergency management” in accordance with § 26(b), ch. 179, SLA 2004.

Sec. 26.23.160.
Compensation.

Personal services may not be compensated by the state or a political subdivision or agency of it, except in accordance with Alaska law or a local ordinance.

Compensation for property shall be made only if the property was commandeered or otherwise used in coping with a disaster emergency, and its use or destruction was ordered by the governor or by a member of the disaster emergency forces of this state who is authorized by the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management to issue such an order.

A person claiming compensation for the use, damage, loss, or destruction of property occasioned by action taken under AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

shall file a claim for that compensation with the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management in the form and manner required by the division.

Unless the amount of compensation resulting from property damaged, lost, or destroyed is agreed upon between the claimant and the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management, the amount of compensation shall be calculated in the same manner as compensation due for a taking of property under the condemnation laws of this state.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1990, in (c) of this section a reference to AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the enactment of AS

26.23.300

and

26.23.400

by ch. 178 SLA 1990.

In 2004, in (b) - (d) of this section, “division of emergency services” was changed to “division of homeland security and emergency management” in accordance with § 26(b), ch. 179, SLA 2004.

Sec. 26.23.170.
Communications.

The Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs shall ascertain what means exist for rapid and efficient communications in times of disaster emergency. The department shall consider the desirability of supplementing these communications resources, or of integrating them into a comprehensive state or state-federal telecommunications network or other communication system or network. In studying the character and feasibility of any system or its several parts, the department shall evaluate the possibility of multi-purpose use of it or its parts for general state and local governmental purposes. The department shall make recommendations to the governor as appropriate.

A statewide 911 coordinator is established within the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs to coordinate and facilitate the implementation of 911 systems throughout the state. The 911 coordinator shall

participate in efforts to set uniform statewide standards for automatic number identification and automatic location identification data transmission for telecommunications systems;

make recommendations as necessary for implementation of basic and enhanced 911 service.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977; am §§ 18, 19 ch 179 SLA 2004)

Sec. 26.23.180.
Mutual aid.

Political subdivisions not participating in interjurisdictional arrangements under AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

nevertheless shall be encouraged and assisted by the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management to conclude suitable arrangements for furnishing mutual aid in coping with disasters. The arrangements must include provision of aid by persons and units in public employment.

In concurring with local disaster plans, the governor shall consider whether they contain adequate provisions for the rendering and receipt of mutual aid.

It is a sufficient reason for the governor to require an interjurisdictional agreement or arrangement under AS

26.23.070

that the area involved and political subdivisions in it have available equipment, supplies, and forces necessary to provide mutual aid on a regional basis, and that the political subdivisions have not already made adequate provision for mutual aid; but in requiring an interjurisdictional arrangement in order to accomplish the purpose of this section, the governor need not require establishment and maintenance of an interjurisdictional disaster planning and service area or arrangement for any other disaster purposes.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977; am § 15 ch 32 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1990, in (a) of this section a reference to AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the enactment of AS

26.23.300

and

26.23.400

by ch. 178, SLA 1990.

In 2004, in (a) of this section, “division of emergency services” was changed to “division of homeland security and emergency management” in accordance with § 26(b), ch. 179, SLA 2004.

Sec. 26.23.190.
Emergency powers.

If entry is reasonably necessary to actually alleviate or prevent the disaster, all persons authorized to carry out emergency measures directed under the provisions of AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

shall be accorded free access to all public and private land and public buildings within the areas specified, and are authorized to enter them and to perform work and take measures that are appropriate without the consent of the owners of the land or buildings.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 32 SLA 1994.]

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 190 SLA 1990; am § 28 ch 32 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1990, in this section a reference to AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the enactment of AS

26.23.300

and

26.23.400

by ch. 178, SLA 1990.

Sec. 26.23.195.
Discharge response actions. [Repealed, § 28 ch 32 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 26.23.200.
Limitations.

Nothing in AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

interferes with or allows interference with the course or conduct of a labor dispute, except that actions otherwise authorized by AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

or other laws may be taken when necessary to forestall or mitigate imminent or existing danger to public health or safety;

interferes with or allows interference with dissemination of news or comment on public affairs; but any communications facility or organization, including but not limited to radio and television stations, wire services, and newspapers, may be requested to transmit or print public service messages furnishing information or instructions in connection with a disaster emergency, in a manner that encroaches as little as possible upon the normal functions of the news media;

affects the jurisdiction or responsibilities of police forces, firefighting forces, units of the armed forces of the United States, or of any personnel of them, when on active duty; but state, local, and interjurisdictional disaster emergency plans shall place reliance upon the forces available for performance of functions related to disaster emergencies;

limits, modifies, or abridges the authority of the governor to proclaim martial law, or exercise any other powers vested in the governor under the constitution, statutes, or common law of this state independent of, or in conjunction with, any provision of AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

; or

authorizes the confiscation of a firearm lawfully owned, possessed, or carried by a law-abiding citizen.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, “AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” in three places in this section to reflect the 1990 enactment of AS

26.23.300

and

26.23.400

.

Sec. 26.23.205.
Confiscation of firearms.

A person convicted of official misconduct under AS

11.56.850

, or interference with constitutional rights under AS

11.76.110

, as a result of confiscating, attempting to confiscate, or ordering the confiscation of a firearm, under color of law, during a disaster emergency,

forfeits any appointed government position and, if under the jurisdiction of the Alaska Police Standards Council, is subject to revocation of the person’s police certification;

is subject to impeachment under art. II, sec. 20, Constitution of the State of Alaska; or

is subject to having the person’s elected municipal office declared vacant under AS

29.20.170

or

29.20.280

.

This section does not apply if the person is acting as a private citizen who has been directed to confiscate a firearm by another whom the person reasonably believes to be a peace officer or active member of the armed forces or militia.

A conviction described in (a) of this section is an offense involving a violation of the oath of office for purposes of AS

29.20.170

or

29.20.280

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 32 SLA 2006)

Sec. 26.23.210.
Relationship to homeland security and civil defense laws.

In the event of a conflict between this chapter and AS 26.20, including in the event the governor declares a disaster under this chapter due to an attack or credible threat of imminent enemy or terrorist attack as described in AS

26.23.900

(2), the provisions of this chapter shall govern.

The provisions of AS

26.20.140

, providing for immunity of government, employees, and other authorized persons in certain circumstances, apply when the entities or persons covered by AS

26.20.140

perform duties under AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

, except as otherwise provided in AS

26.23.136

for entities or other persons providing assistance to the state under a compact in a form substantially as contained in AS

26.23.136

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977; am § 12 ch 178 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 55 SLA 2002; am § 10 ch 43 SLA 2003; am § 20 ch 179 SLA 2004)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2003 (HB 245), which added (c) of this section, see 2003 House Journal 777— 783.

Sec. 26.23.215.
Relationship to other planning statutes. [Repealed, § 28 ch 32 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 26.23.220.
Administration.

AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

shall be administered by the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs, which is responsible to, and which may receive delegations of authority from, the governor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977; am E.O. No. 58, § 17 (1984))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1990, in this section a reference to AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the enactment of AS

26.23.300

and

26.23.400

by ch. 178, SLA 1990.

Administrative Code. —

For 1998 western Alaska fisheries disaster emergency disaster assistance, see 6 AAC 94, art. 1.

For individual and family disaster grants, see 6 AAC 94, art. 2.

For temporary housing assistance, see 6 AAC 94, art. 3.

Sec. 26.23.230.

[Renumbered as AS 26.23.900.]

Sec. 26.23.240.
Short title.

AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.240

and

26.23.900

may be cited collectively as the Alaska Disaster Act.

History.

(§ 16 ch 58 SLA 2010)